District of Columbia statutes.
38-173

Budget requirements of the District of Columbia Public Schools.

(a)

The Mayor shall submit the budget for DCPS pursuant to § 1-204.42, along with a plan detailing the allocation of funds to each DCPS public school by program and activity level and comptroller source group.

(b)

The Council may, following its review of the plan submitted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, modify the funding and other resource levels, including full-time equivalent allocations, allocated by the plan to individual schools by a 2/3 majority vote of the Council.

(c)

For fiscal year 2009, the Council may reallocate funds on a program level, but shall not make adjustments to activity costs within a program level; provided, that this restriction shall not apply to Special Education State, or any other local or state special education category the Mayor may designate.

(d)

Beginning with fiscal year 2010, for each program level, the Mayor shall submit:

(1)

Actual expenditures for the prior school year;

(2)

Estimated expenditures for the current school year; and

(3)

Projected expenditures for the following school year.

June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 104, 54 DCR 4102